Florida, session 2026, HB4003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 3.05 of Article III
of chapter 97-367, Laws of Florida, as amended by City of Marco
Island Ordinance No. 02-20 and City of Marco Island Ordinance
No. 09-15, is amended to read:
ARTICLE III - LEGISLATIVE
Section 3.05 – Vacancies.
(3)(a) A vacancy on the Council shall be filled by holding
a special election for the unexpired term to be called by the
city clerk upon a resolution adopted by the Council. The special
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4003 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4003 2026 Legislature
election shall be held within 130 days after the occurrence of
the vacancy, unless the vacancy occurs within one (1) year
before a general election of city officials, in which event the
Council shall, within 60 days after the occurrence of such
vacancy, by a majority vote, appoint a citizen who meets the
requirements for qualification under section 5.03(1) of the
Charter who shall hold office until the next general election.
(b) If four or more Council vacancies occur at one time or
the Council does not appoint a qualified citizen to fill a
vacancy within 60 days when appointment is required by paragraph
(a), the Governor shall fill such vacancies until successors are
chosen at the next regular election.
(c) If the Council does not adopt a resolution to call a
special election within 30 days after the occurrence of the
vacancy when a special election is required by paragraph (a),
the Governor shall call a special election within 10 days. as
follows:
(a) If a vacancy occurs and the remainder of the unexpired
term is 28 months or less, the remaining Council Members shall,
within sixty (60) days following the occurrence of such vacancy,
by majority vote of the Council Members, appoint a person to
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(b) If the remainder of the unexpired term exceeds 28
months, the remaining Council Members shall, within sixty (60)
days following the occurrence of such vacancy, by majority vote
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4003 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4003 2026 Legislature
of the Council Members seated, appoint a person to fill the
vacancy until the next regularly scheduled City election at
which the balance of the term for the seat shall be filled in
accordance with Article V.
(c) If four or more Council vacancies occur at one time,
the Governor shall fill such vacancies until successors are
chosen at the next regular election.
Section 2. Referendum election.—
(1) A referendum on the adoption of section 1 of this act
shall be held on November 3, 2026, concurrent with the 2026
general election.
(2) The ballot title for the referendum question shall be
in substantially the following form: "REVISIONS TO CITY OF MARCO
ISLAND'S PROCEDURES FOR FILLING VACANT CITY COUNCIL SEATS."
(3) The referendum question shall be placed on the ballot
in substantially the following form:
Shall Chapter 2026-___, Laws of Florida, amending the
charter of the City of Marco Island to require a special
election to fill a Council vacancy, unless the vacancy
occurs within 1 year before a general election, in which
event the Council shall appoint a qualified citizen to hold
office until the next general election; and to provide for
the Governor to call a special election or appoint a
Council member in certain circumstances, become effective?

Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4003 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4003 2026 Legislature
( ) YES.
( ) NO.

(4) The referendum shall be conducted by the Supervisor of
Elections of Collier County in accordance with the Florida
Election Code.
Section 3. This act shall take effect only upon its
approval by a majority vote of qualified electors residing in
the City of Marco Island voting in a referendum held on November
3, 2026, concurrent with the 2026 general election, except that
section 2 and this section shall take effect upon becoming a
law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4003 -01-er